Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-613
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Uniform Electronic Transactions Act, the definitions found in sections 86-614 to 86-629 apply.

Laws 2000, LB 929, § 2;

R.S.Supp.,2000, § 86-2102;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 375.